Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1

Admission of Members

48-56-101. Admission.

A corporation may admit any person as a member. If there are to be criteria or procedures for admission as a member, then such criteria or procedures shall be established by the charter or bylaws.

No person shall be admitted as a member without the person's consent.

A corporation may issue certificates evidencing membership therein, but such certificates shall not include provisions inconsistent with the charter, bylaws, or chapters 51-68 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 6.01.

Cross-References. Application of nonprofit corporation law, chs. 51-67 of this title, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, § 48-68-101.

Business corporations, shareholders, title 48, ch. 17.

Business corporations, shares and distributions, title 48, ch. 16.

48-56-102. Consideration.

Except as provided in its charter or bylaws, a corporation may admit members for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 6.02.

48-56-103. No members required.

A corporation is not required to have members.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 6.03.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.